Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.173

Alien possession of firearms—Alien firearm license—Political subdivisions may not modify requirements—Penalty for false statement.

(1) In order to obtain an alien firearm license, a nonimmigrant alien residing in Washington must apply to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides.

(2) The sheriff of the county shall within sixty days after the filing of an application of a nonimmigrant alien residing in the state of Washington, issue an alien firearm license to such person to carry or possess a firearm for the purposes of hunting and sport shooting. The license shall be good for two years. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for alien firearm licenses during regular business hours. An application for a license may not be denied, unless the applicant's alien firearm license is in a revoked status, or the applicant:

(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;

(b) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, * 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;

(c) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense; or

(d) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.

No license application shall be granted to a nonimmigrant alien convicted of a felony unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or unless RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.

(3) The sheriff shall check with the national crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm.

(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the applicant, a copy of the applicant's passport and visa showing the applicant is in the country legally, and a valid Washington hunting license or documentation that the applicant is a member of a sport shooting club.

A signed application for an alien firearm license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for an alien firearm license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm. The nonimmigrant alien applicant shall be required to produce a passport and visa as evidence of being in the country legally.

The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing. The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.

The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this section.

(5) The sheriff has the authority to collect a nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the two-year license. The fee shall be fifty dollars plus additional charges imposed by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license. The fee shall be retained by the sheriff.

(6) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the sheriff.

(7) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.

(8) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for an alien firearm license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the alien firearm license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for an alien firearm license.

[ 2021 c 215 s 95; 2019 c 46 s 5005; 2018 c 201 s 6006; 2017 c 174 s 2; 2009 c 216 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.10.040 was repealed by 2020 c 312 s 905.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.